Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Creation and Boundaries [Repealed]

7-83-201. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.50 (Williams, § 3708.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2703; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries of power districts.

7-83-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.50 (Williams, § 3708.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2704; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries of power districts.

7-83-203. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.50 (Williams, § 3708.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2705; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries of power districts.

7-83-204. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.50 (Williams, § 3708.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2706; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries of power districts.

7-83-205. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.51 (Williams, § 3708.54); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2707; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries.

7-83-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.52 (Williams, § 3708.55); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2708; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 2, §§7-83-201 —7-83-206, concerned creation and boundaries of power districts.